Hawaii statutes.
§109-2 Stadium authority; powers and
duties. The powers and duties of the stadium authority shall be as
follows:

(1) To maintain, operate, and manage the stadium and
related facilities;

(2) To prescribe and collect rents, fees, and charges
for the use or enjoyment of the stadium or any of its facilities;

(3) To make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to exercise its powers under this chapter
and subject to any limitations in this chapter, to exercise all powers necessary,
incidental, or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and
provisions of this chapter;

(4) To adopt, amend, and repeal in accordance with
chapter 91 rules it may deem necessary to effectuate this chapter and in
connection with its projects, operations, and facilities;

(5) To appoint a manager and a deputy manager who
shall have qualifications as the authority deems necessary and who shall hold
their respective offices at the pleasure of the authority. The manager and
deputy manager shall be exempt from the requirements of chapters 76 and 89.
Effective July 1, 2005, the manager shall be paid a salary not to exceed
eighty-seven per cent of the salary of the director of human resources
development. Effective July 1, 2005, the deputy manager shall be paid a salary
not to exceed eighty-five per cent of the manager's salary. The manager shall
have full power to administer the affairs of the stadium and related
facilities, subject to the direction and approval of the authority. The
manager shall, subject to the approval of the authority, have power to appoint,
suspend, and discharge a secretary who shall be exempt from the requirements of
chapters 76 and 89, and other employees, subordinates, and assistants as may be
necessary for the proper conduct of the business of the authority. Except for
persons hired on contract or otherwise as provided in section 109-3 and except
for the manager, deputy manager, and secretary, all appointments, suspensions,
or discharges shall be made in conformity with the applicable provisions of
chapter 76; and

(6) To plan, promote, and market the stadium and
related facilities. [L 1970, c 172, §2; am L 1971, c 125, pt of §1; am L 1975,
c 172, §1; am L 1976, c 158, §1; am L 1982, c 129, §5; am L 1986, c 128, §5; am
L 1989, c 329, §4; am L 1995, c 149, §1; am L 1999, c 160, §8; am L 2000, c
253, §150; am L 2002, c 148, §12; am L 2005, c 226, §5; am L 2016, c 61, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next